Louisiana, session 2026, HB1215.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 25:915 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§915. Disposition of certain historical statues and monuments
A. As used in this Section, the following terms shall have the following
meanings:
(1) "Public entity" means the state or any political subdivision, including any
agency, board, or commission thereof.
(2) "Historical statue or monument" means any statue, memorial, marker, or
commemorative structure owned by a public entity and located on public property
for the purpose of commemorating a historical person, event, or era.
(3) "Office of state parks" means the office of state parks within the
Department of Culture, Recreation and Tourism.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2157 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1215
B.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any historical
statue or monument owned by a public entity that is removed from public display on
or after August 1, 2006, and that is in the possession of the public entity shall be
transferred to the office of state parks.
(2) The transfer shall include all rights of custody and control.
(3) The public entity shall coordinate with the office of state parks to provide
for the delivery of the historical statue or monument to the office of state parks.
C.(1) The office of state parks shall designate and maintain a location within
the state park system for the placement of historical statues or monuments
transferred pursuant to this Section.
(2) The office of state parks shall determine the placement and manner of
display with due regard for preservation and public access.
(3) The office of state parks shall not place any historical statue or monument
that is transferred pursuant to this Section within the parish from which the historical
statue or monument was removed from public display.
D. The office of state parks shall provide interpretive signage or materials
for each historical statue or monument that present accurate historical context,
including the subject commemorated and the circumstances of its original placement
and subsequent removal.
E. The office of state parks may promulgate rules in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Section.
F. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to abrogate, impair, or
supersede the provisions of R.S. 44:406.